Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.53.010

Approval by director—Required.

Upon approval by the director consistent with this chapter, merging trust companies, one of which is a state trust company, may be merged to result in a resulting trust company.

[ 2019 c 389 s 96; 2014 c 37 s 389.]